California statutes. Probate Code
-------------------------------------------

19324.

(a) The trustee, the personal representative, if any, of a deceased settlor’s probate estate, and the surviving spouse may provide for allocation of debts by agreement so long as the agreement substantially protects the rights of other interested persons. The trustee, the personal representative, or the spouse may request and obtain court approval of the allocation provided in the agreement. 

(b) In the absence of an agreement, each debt subject to allocation shall first be characterized by the court as separate or community, in accordance with the laws of the state applicable to marital dissolution proceedings. Following that characterization, the debt or debts shall be allocated as follows:

(1) Separate debts of either spouse shall be allocated to that spouse’s separate property assets, and community debts shall be allocated to the spouses’ community property assets.

(2) If a separate property asset of either spouse is subject to a secured debt that is characterized as that spouse’s separate debt, and the net equity in that asset available to satisfy that secured debt is less than that secured debt, the unsatisfied portion of that secured debt shall be treated as an unsecured separate debt of that spouse and allocated to the net value of that spouse’s other separate property assets.

(3) If the net value of either spouse’s separate property assets is less than that spouse’s unsecured separate debt or debts, the unsatisfied portion of the debt or debts shall be allocated to the net value of that spouse’s one-half share of the community property assets. If the net value of that spouse’s one-half share of the community property assets is less than that spouse’s unsatisfied unsecured separate debt or debts, the remaining unsatisfied portion of the debt or debts shall be allocated to the net value of the other spouse’s one-half share of the community property assets.

(4) If a community property asset is subject to a secured debt that is characterized as a community debt, and the net equity in that asset available to satisfy that secured debt is less than that secured debt, the unsatisfied portion of that secured debt shall be treated as an unsecured community debt and allocated to the net value of the other community property assets.

(5) If the net value of the community property assets is less than the unsecured community debt or debts, the unsatisfied portion of the debt or debts shall be allocated equally between the separate property assets of the deceased settlor and the surviving spouse. If the net value of either spouse’s separate property assets is less than that spouse’s share of the unsatisfied portion of the unsecured community debt or debts, the remaining unsatisfied portion of the debt or debts shall be allocated to the net value of the other spouse’s separate property assets.

(c) For purposes of this section:

(1) The net value of either spouse’s separate property asset shall refer to its fair market value as of the date of the deceased settlor’s death, minus the date-of-death balance of any liens and encumbrances on that asset that have been characterized as that spouse’s separate debts.

(2) The net value of a community property asset shall refer to its fair market value as of the date of the deceased settlor’s death, minus the date-of-death balance of any liens and encumbrances on that asset that have been characterized as community debts.

(3) In the case of a nonrecourse debt, the amount of that debt shall be limited to the net equity in the collateral, based on the fair market value of the collateral as of the date of the decedent’s death, that is available to satisfy that debt. For the purposes of this paragraph, “nonrecourse debt” means a debt for which the debtor’s obligation to repay is limited to the collateral securing the debt, and for which a deficiency judgment against the debtor is not permitted by law.

(d) Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section, the court may order a different allocation of debts between the deceased settlor’s probate estate, trust, and the surviving spouse if the court finds a different allocation to be equitable under the circumstances.

(e) Nothing contained in this section is intended to impair or affect the rights of third parties. If a trustee, a personal representative, if any, of a deceased settlor’s probate estate, or the surviving spouse incurs any damages or expense, including attorney’s fees, on account of the nonpayment of a debt that was allocated to the other party pursuant to subdivision (b), or as the result of a debt being misallocated due to fraud or intentional misrepresentation by the other party, the party incurring damages shall be entitled to recover from the other party for damages or expense deemed reasonable by the court that made the allocation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 72, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

19325.

On making a determination as provided in this chapter, the court shall make an order that:

(a) Directs the trustee to make payment of the amounts allocated to the trust by payment to the surviving spouse or creditors. 

(b) Directs the trustee to charge amounts allocated to the surviving spouse against any property or interests of the surviving spouse that are in the possession or control of the trustee. To the extent that property or interests of the surviving spouse in the possession or control of the trustee are insufficient to satisfy the allocation, the court order shall summarily direct the surviving spouse to pay the allocation to the trustee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 992, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

19326.

Notwithstanding any other statute, funeral expenses and expenses of last illness, in the absence of specific provisions in a will or trust to the contrary, shall be charged against the deceased settlor’s probate estate and thereafter, against the deceased settlor’s share of the trust and shall not be allocated to or charged against, the community share of the surviving spouse, whether or not the surviving spouse is financially able to pay the expenses and whether or not the surviving spouse or any other person is also liable for the expenses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 992, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Liability of Settlor’s Surviving Spouse [19330. - 19330.]

19330.

If proceedings are commenced under this part for the settlement of claims against the trust, and the time for filing claims has commenced, any action upon the liability of the surviving spouse under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 13550) is barred to the same extent as provided for claims under this part, except as to the following:

(a) Any creditor who commences judicial proceedings to enforce a claim and serves the surviving spouse with the complaint prior to the expiration of the time for filing claims. 

(b) Any creditor who has or who secures the surviving spouse’s acknowledgment in writing of the liability of the surviving spouse for the claim. 

(c) Any creditor who files a timely claim in the proceedings for the administration of the estate of the deceased spouse.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 992, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12. Distributee Liability [19400. - 19403.]

19400.

Subject to Section 366.2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, if there is no proceeding to administer the probate estate of the deceased settlor, and if the trustee does not file a proposed notice to creditors pursuant to Section 19003 and does not publish notice to creditors pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 19040), then a beneficiary of the trust to whom payment, delivery, or transfer of the deceased settlor’s property is made pursuant to the terms of the trust is personally liable, to the extent provided in Section 19402, for the unsecured claims of the creditors of the deceased settlor’s probate
 estate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 48, Sec. 10.   (SB 785)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

19401.

Subject to Section 19402, if the trustee filed a proposed notice to creditors pursuant to Section 19003 and published notice to creditors pursuant to Section 19040, and if the identity of the creditor was known to, or reasonably ascertainable by, the trustee within four months of the first publication of notice pursuant to Section 19040, then a person to whom property is distributed is personally liable for the claim of the creditor, without a claim first having been filed, if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(a) The claim of the creditor was not merely conjectural.

(b) Notice to the creditor was not given to the creditor under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 19050) and neither the creditor nor the attorney representing the creditor in the matter had actual knowledge of the administration of the trust estate sooner than one year after the date of first publication of notice pursuant to Section 19040. 

(c) The statute of limitations applicable to the claim under Section 366.2 of the Code of Civil Procedure has not expired at the time of commencement of an action under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 178, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

19402.

(a) In any action under this chapter, subject to Section 366.2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the distributee may assert any defenses, cross-complaints, or setoffs that would have been available to the deceased settlor if the settlor had not died.

(b) Personal liability under this chapter is applicable only to the extent the claim of the creditor cannot be satisfied out of the trust estate of the deceased settlor and is limited to a pro rata portion of the claim of the creditor, based on the proportion that the value of the property distributed to the person out of the trust estate bears to the total value of all property distributed to all persons out of the trust estate. Personal liability under this chapter for all claims of all creditors shall not exceed the value of the property distributed to the person out of the trust estate. As used in this chapter, the value of the property is the fair market value of the property on the date of its distribution, less the amount of any liens and encumbrances on the property at that time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 178, Sec. 48.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

19403.

Nothing in this chapter affects the rights of a purchaser or encumbrancer of property in good faith and for value from a person who is personally liable under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 280.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 9. Uniform Trust Decanting Act [19501. - 19530.]

19501.

This part may be cited as the Uniform Trust Decanting Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   (SB 909)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19502.

For purposes of this part:

(a) “Appointive property” means the property or property interest subject to a power of appointment.

(b) “Ascertainable standard” means a standard relating to an individual’s health, education, support, or maintenance within the meaning of Section 2041(b)(1)(A) or Section 2514(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. Secs. 2041(b)(1)(A), 2514(c)(1)) and any applicable regulations.

(c) “Authorized fiduciary” means any of the following:

(1) A trustee or other fiduciary, other than a settlor, that has discretion to distribute or direct a trustee
 to distribute part or all of the principal of the first trust to one or more current beneficiaries.

(2) A special fiduciary appointed under Section 19509.

(3) A special-needs fiduciary under Section 19513.

(d) “Beneficiary” means a person that meets one of the following conditions:

(1) Has a present or future, vested or contingent, beneficial interest in a trust.

(2) Holds a power of appointment over trust property.

(3) Is an identified charitable organization that will or may receive distributions under the terms of the trust.

(e) “Charitable interest” means an
 interest in a trust that meets one of the following conditions:

(1) Is held by an identified charitable organization and makes the organization a qualified beneficiary.

(2) Benefits only charitable organizations and, if the interest were held by an identified charitable organization, would make the organization a qualified beneficiary.

(3) Is held solely for charitable purposes and, if the interest were held by an identified charitable organization, would make the organization a qualified beneficiary.

(f) “Charitable organization” means either of the following:

(1) A person, other than an individual, organized and operated exclusively for charitable purposes.

(2) A government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, to the extent it holds funds exclusively for a charitable purpose.

(g) “Charitable purpose” means the relief of poverty, the advancement of education or religion, the promotion of health, a municipal or other governmental purpose, or another purpose the achievement of which is beneficial to the community.

(h) “Court” means the court in this state having jurisdiction in matters relating to trusts.

(i) “Current beneficiary” means a beneficiary that on the date the beneficiary’s qualification is determined is a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal. The term includes the holder of a presently exercisable general power of appointment but does not include a
 person that is a beneficiary only because the person holds any other power of appointment.

(j) “Decanting power” or “the decanting power” means the power of an authorized fiduciary under this part to distribute property of a first trust to one or more second trusts or to modify the terms of the first trust.

(k) “Expanded distributive discretion” means a discretionary power of distribution that is not limited to an ascertainable standard or a reasonably definite standard.

(l) “First trust” means a trust over which an authorized fiduciary may exercise the decanting power.

(m) “First trust instrument” means the trust instrument for a first trust.

(n) “General power of appointment” means a
 power of appointment exercisable in favor of a powerholder, the powerholder’s estate, a creditor of the powerholder, or a creditor of the powerholder’s estate.

(o) “Jurisdiction,” with respect to a geographic area, includes a state or country.

(p) “Person” means an individual, estate, business or nonprofit entity, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or other legal entity.

(q) “Power of appointment” means a power that enables a powerholder acting in a nonfiduciary capacity to designate a recipient of an ownership interest in, or another power of appointment over, the appointive property. The term does not include a power of attorney.

(r) “Powerholder” means a person in which a donor creates a power of
 appointment.

(s) “Presently exercisable power of appointment” means a power of appointment exercisable by the powerholder at the relevant time.

(1) The term includes a power of appointment exercisable only after the occurrence of a specified event, the satisfaction of an ascertainable standard, or the passage of a specified time only after one of the following, respectively:

(A) The occurrence of the specified event.

(B) The satisfaction of the ascertainable standard.

(C) The passage of the specified time.

(2) The term does not include a power exercisable only at the powerholder’s death.

(t) “Qualified beneficiary” means a beneficiary that, on the date the beneficiary’s qualification is determined, satisfies one of the following conditions:

(1) Is a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal.

(2) Would be a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal if the interests of the distributees described in paragraph (1) terminated on that date without causing the trust to terminate.

(3) Would be a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal if the trust terminated on that date.

(u) “Reasonably definite standard” means a clearly measurable standard under which a holder of a power of distribution is legally
 accountable within the meaning of Section 674(b)(5)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. Sec. 674(b)(5)(A)) and any applicable regulations.

(v) “Second trust” means either of the following:

(1) A first trust after modification under this part.

(2) A trust to which a distribution of property from a first trust is or may be made under this part.

(w) “Second trust instrument” means the trust instrument for a second trust.

(x) “Settlor,” except as otherwise provided in Section 19525, means a person, including a testator, that creates or contributes property to a trust. If more than one person creates or contributes property to a trust, each person is a settlor of the portion of the trust
 property attributable to the person’s contribution except to the extent another person has power to revoke or withdraw that portion.

(y) “State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

(z) “Terms of the trust” means the manifestation of the settlor’s intent regarding a trust’s provisions as expressed in the trust instrument, as may be established by other evidence that would be admissible in a judicial proceeding, or as may be established by court order or nonjudicial settlement agreement.

(aa) “Trust instrument” means a trust executed by the settlor to create a trust or by any person to create a second trust that contains some or all of the terms of the trust,
 including any amendments.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   (SB 909)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19503.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), this part applies to an express trust that is irrevocable or revocable by the settlor only with the consent of the trustee or a person holding an adverse interest.

(b) This part does not apply to a trust held solely for charitable purposes.

(c) Subject to Section 19515, a trust instrument may restrict or prohibit exercise of the decanting power.

(d) This part does not limit the power of a trustee, powerholder, or other person to distribute or appoint property in further trust or to modify a trust under the trust instrument, law of this state other than
 this part, common law, a court order, or a nonjudicial settlement agreement.

(e) This part does not affect the ability of a settlor to provide in a trust instrument for the distribution of the trust property or appointment in further trust of the trust property or for modification of the trust instrument.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   (SB 909)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19504.

(a) In exercising the decanting power, an authorized fiduciary shall act in accordance with its fiduciary duties, including the duty to act in accordance with the purposes of the first trust.

(b) This part does not create or imply a duty to exercise the decanting power or to inform beneficiaries about the applicability of this part.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in a first trust instrument, for purposes of this part, the terms of the first trust are deemed to include the decanting power.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   (SB 909)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19505.

This part applies to a trust created before, on, or after January 1, 2019, that satisfies either of the following conditions:

(a) Has its principal place of administration in this state, including a trust whose principal place of administration has been changed to this state.

(b) Provides by its trust instrument that it is governed by the law of this state or is governed by the law of this state for the purpose of any of the following:

(1) Administration, including administration of a trust whose governing law for purposes of administration has been changed to the law of this state.

(2) Construction of terms of the trust.

(3) Determining the meaning or effect of terms of the trust.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   (SB 909)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19507.

(a) In this section, a notice period begins on the day notice is given under subdivision (c) and ends 59 days after the day notice is given.

(b) An authorized fiduciary may exercise the decanting power without the consent of any person and without court approval in compliance with this part.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (h), an authorized fiduciary shall give notice of the intended exercise of the decanting power not later than 60 days before the exercise to all of the following:

(1) Each settlor of the first trust, if living or then in existence.

(2) Each
 qualified beneficiary of the first trust.

(3) Each holder of a presently exercisable power of appointment over any part or all of the first trust.

(4) Each person that currently has the right to remove or replace the authorized fiduciary.

(5) Each other fiduciary of the first trust.

(6) Each fiduciary of the second trust.

(7) The Attorney General, if subdivision (b) of Section 19514 applies.

(d) Unless the trust instrument provides otherwise, an authorized fiduciary shall give notice under subdivision (c) to the guardian ad litem for a qualified beneficiary who is a minor and has no representative or who is an unascertained
 or unborn beneficiary. If a guardian ad litem has not been appointed at the time of the notice, the authorized fiduciary shall seek the appointment of one. The court may appoint a guardian ad litem, for purposes of this section, in instances where the only matter before the court is that appointment.

(e) If an authorized fiduciary knows, or has reason to know, that a person entitled to notice under subdivision (c) is substantially unable to manage that person’s own financial resources or resist fraud or undue influence, the authorized fiduciary shall give notice under subdivision (c) to that person and to the individual appointed to act on that person’s behalf, including, but not limited to, an attorney-in-fact under a power of attorney. If no such individual has been appointed at the time of the notice, the authorized fiduciary shall seek the appointment of such an individual. The court may appoint a guardian ad litem, for purposes of this
 section, in instances where the only matter before the court is that appointment.

(f) An authorized fiduciary is not required to give notice under subdivision (c) to a person who is known to the fiduciary but cannot be located by the fiduciary after reasonable diligence.

(g) A notice under subdivision (c) shall include all of the following:

(1) A description of the manner in which the authorized fiduciary intends to exercise the decanting power, which shall include a statement as to the authorized fiduciary’s reason for the proposed decanting and an explanation as to the differences between the first trust and the second trust or trusts.

(2) The proposed effective date for exercise of the power.

(3) A copy of the first trust instrument.

(4) A copy of all second trust instruments.

(5) A warning, set out in a separate paragraph in not less than 10-point bold type, or a reasonable equivalent thereof, that states the following:
“If you do not bring a court action to contest the proposed trust decanting (the proposed changes to the trust) within 59 days of this notice, you will lose your right to contest the decanting.”
(h) The decanting power may be exercised before expiration of the notice period under subdivision (a) if all persons entitled to receive notice waive the period in a signed waiver.

(i) The
 receipt of notice, waiver of the notice period, or expiration of the notice period does not affect the right of a person to file an application under Section 19509 that asserts either of the following:

(1) An attempted exercise of the decanting power is ineffective because it did not comply with this part or was an abuse of discretion or breach of fiduciary duty.

(2) Section 19522 applies to the exercise of the decanting power.

(j) The notice required by this section shall be served by mail to the last known address, pursuant to Section 1215, or by personal delivery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 260, Sec. 23.   (SB 345)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

19508.

(a) Notice to a person with authority to represent and bind another person under this code or a first trust instrument has the same effect as notice given directly to the person represented.

(b) Consent of or waiver by a person with authority to represent and bind another person under this code or a first trust instrument is binding on the person represented unless the person represented objects to the representation before the consent or waiver otherwise would become effective.

(c) A person with authority to represent and bind another person under this code or a first trust instrument may file an application under Section 19509 on behalf of the person represented.

(d) A settlor may not represent or bind a beneficiary under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   (SB 909)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19509.

(a) On application of an authorized fiduciary, a person entitled to notice under subdivision (c) of Section 19507, a beneficiary, or, with respect to a charitable interest, the Attorney General or other person that has standing to enforce the charitable interest, the court may do any of the following:

(1) Provide instructions to the authorized fiduciary regarding whether a proposed exercise of the decanting power is permitted under this part and is consistent with the fiduciary duties of the authorized fiduciary.

(2) Appoint a special fiduciary and authorize the special fiduciary to determine whether the decanting power should be exercised under this part and to exercise the
 decanting power.

(3) Approve an exercise of the decanting power.

(4) Determine that a proposed or attempted exercise of the decanting power is ineffective because of either of the following:

(A) After applying Section 19522, the proposed or attempted exercise does not or did not comply with this part.

(B) The proposed or attempted exercise would be or was an abuse of the fiduciary’s discretion or a breach of fiduciary duty.

(5) Determine the extent to which Section 19522 applies to a prior exercise of the decanting power.

(6) Provide instructions to the trustee regarding the application of Section 19522 to a prior exercise of
 the decanting power.

(7) Order other relief to carry out the purposes of this part.

(b) If an application is made under subdivision (a), the burden is on the authorized fiduciary to establish that notice was given as required by Section 19507 and that the authorized fiduciary may exercise the decanting power.

(c) On application of an authorized fiduciary, the court may approve either or both of the following:

(1) An increase in the fiduciary’s compensation under Section 19516.

(2) A modification under Section 19518 of a provision granting a person the right to remove or replace the fiduciary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   (SB 909)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19510.

An exercise of the decanting power shall be made in a writing signed by an authorized fiduciary. The signed writing shall, directly or by reference to the notice required by Section 19507, identify the first trust and the second trust or trusts and state the property of the first trust being distributed to each second trust and the property, if any, that remains in the first trust.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   (SB 909)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19511.

(a) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Noncontingent right” means a right that is not subject to the exercise of discretion or the occurrence of a specified event that is not certain to occur. The term does not include a right held by a beneficiary if any person has discretion to distribute property subject to the right to any person other than the beneficiary or the beneficiary’s estate.

(2) “Presumptive remainder beneficiary” means a qualified beneficiary other than a current beneficiary.

(3) “Successor beneficiary” means a beneficiary that is not a qualified beneficiary on the date the beneficiary’s qualification
 is determined. The term does not include a person that is a beneficiary only because the person holds a nongeneral power of appointment.

(4) “Vested interest” means any of the following:

(A) A right to a mandatory distribution that is a noncontingent right as of the date of the exercise of the decanting power.

(B) A current and noncontingent right, annually or more frequently, to a mandatory distribution of income, a specified dollar amount, or a percentage of value of some or all of the trust property.

(C) A current and noncontingent right, annually or more frequently, to withdraw income, a specified dollar amount, or a percentage of value of some or all of the trust property.

(D) A
 presently exercisable general power of appointment.

(E) A right to receive an ascertainable part of the trust property on the trust’s termination that is not subject to the exercise of discretion or to the occurrence of a specified event that is not certain to occur.

(b) Subject to subdivision (c) and Section 19514, an authorized fiduciary that has expanded distributive discretion over the principal of a first trust for the benefit of one or more current beneficiaries may exercise the decanting power over the principal of the first trust.

(c) Subject to Section 19513, in an exercise of the decanting power under this section, a second trust may not do any of the following:

(1) Include as a current beneficiary a person that is not a current beneficiary of
 the first trust, except as otherwise provided in subdivision (d).

(2) Include as a presumptive remainder beneficiary or successor beneficiary a person that is not a current beneficiary, presumptive remainder beneficiary, or successor beneficiary of the first trust, except as otherwise provided in subdivision (d).

(3) Reduce or eliminate a vested interest.

(d) Subject to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) and Section 19514, in an exercise of the decanting power under this section, a second trust may be a trust created or administered under the law of any jurisdiction and may do each of the following:

(1) Retain a power of appointment granted in the first trust.

(2) Omit a power of appointment
 granted in the first trust, other than a presently exercisable general power of appointment.

(3) Create or modify a power of appointment if the powerholder is a current beneficiary of the first trust and the authorized fiduciary has expanded distributive discretion to distribute principal to the beneficiary.

(4) Create or modify a power of appointment if the powerholder is a presumptive remainder beneficiary or successor beneficiary of the first trust, but the exercise of the power may take effect only after the powerholder becomes, or would have become if then living, a current beneficiary.

(e) A power of appointment described in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (d) may be general or nongeneral. The class of permissible appointees in favor of which the power may be exercised may be broader than, or
 different from, the beneficiaries of the first trust.

(f) If an authorized fiduciary has expanded distributive discretion over part but not all of the principal of a first trust, the fiduciary may exercise the decanting power under this section over that part of the principal over which the authorized fiduciary has expanded distributive discretion.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   (SB 909)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19512.

(a) For purposes of this section, “limited distributive discretion” means a discretionary power of distribution that is limited to an ascertainable standard or a reasonably definite standard.

(b) An authorized fiduciary that has limited distributive discretion over the principal of the first trust for benefit of one or more current beneficiaries may exercise the decanting power over the principal of the first trust.

(c) Under this section and subject to Section 19514, a second trust may be created or administered under the law of any jurisdiction. Under this section, the second trusts, in the aggregate, shall grant each beneficiary of the first trust beneficial interests which are
 substantially similar to the beneficial interests of the beneficiary in the first trust. For purposes of this subdivision, “substantially similar” means that there is no material change in a beneficiary’s beneficial interests, except as provided in subdivision (d).

(d) A power to make a distribution under a second trust for the benefit of a beneficiary who is an individual is substantially similar to a power under the first trust to make a distribution directly to the beneficiary. A distribution is for the benefit of a beneficiary if it satisfies any of the following conditions:

(1) The distribution is applied for the benefit of the beneficiary.

(2) The beneficiary is under a legal disability or the trustee reasonably believes the beneficiary is incapacitated, and the distribution is made as permitted under this
 code.

(3) The distribution is made as permitted under the terms of the first trust instrument and the second trust instrument for the benefit of the beneficiary.

(e) If an authorized fiduciary has limited distributive discretion over part but not all of the principal of a first trust, the fiduciary may exercise the decanting power under this section over that part of the principal over which the authorized fiduciary has limited distributive discretion.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   (SB 909)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19513.

(a) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Beneficiary with a disability” means a beneficiary of a first trust who the special needs fiduciary believes may qualify for governmental benefits based on disability, whether or not the beneficiary currently receives those benefits or is an individual who has been adjudicated legally incompetent.

(2) “Governmental benefits” means financial aid or services from a state, federal, or other public agency.

(3) “Special needs fiduciary” means, with respect to a trust that has a beneficiary with a disability, any of the following:

(A) A trustee or other fiduciary, other than a settlor, that has discretion to distribute part or all of the principal of a first trust to one or more current beneficiaries.

(B) If no trustee or fiduciary has discretion under subparagraph (A), a trustee or other fiduciary, other than a settlor, that has discretion to distribute part or all of the income of the first trust to one or more current beneficiaries.

(C) If no trustee or fiduciary has discretion under subparagraphs (A) and (B), a trustee or other fiduciary, other than a settlor, that is required to distribute part or all of the income or principal of the first trust to one or more current beneficiaries.

(4) “Special needs trust” means a trust the trustee believes would not be considered a resource for purposes of determining whether a
 beneficiary with a disability is eligible for governmental benefits.

(b) A special needs fiduciary may exercise the decanting power under Section 19511 over the principal of a first trust as if the fiduciary had authority to distribute principal to a beneficiary with a disability subject to expanded distributive discretion if both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) A second trust is a special needs trust that benefits the beneficiary with a disability.

(2) The special needs fiduciary determines that exercise of the decanting power will further the purposes of the first trust.

(c) In an exercise of the decanting power under this section, all of the following rules apply:

(1) Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 19511, the interest in the second trust of a beneficiary with a disability may fulfill either of the following:

(A) Be a pooled trust as defined by Medicaid law for the benefit of the beneficiary with a disability under Section 1396p(d)(4)(C) of the Public Health and Welfare Code (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396p(d)(4)(C)).

(B) Contain payback provisions complying with reimbursement requirements of Medicaid law under Section 1396p(d)(4)(A) of the Public Health and Welfare Code (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396p(d)(4)(A)).

(2) Paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 19511 does not apply to the interests of the beneficiary with a disability.

(3) Except as affected by any change to the interests of
 the beneficiary with a disability, the second trust, or if there are two or more second trusts, the second trusts in the aggregate, shall grant each other beneficiary of the first trust beneficial interests in the second trusts which are substantially similar to the beneficiary’s beneficial interests in the first trust.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   (SB 909)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

19514.

(a) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Determinable charitable interest” means a charitable interest that is a right to a mandatory distribution currently, periodically, on the occurrence of a specified event, or after the passage of a specified time and that is unconditional or will be held solely for charitable purposes.

(2) “Unconditional” means not subject to the occurrence of a specified event that is not certain to occur, other than a requirement in a trust instrument that a charitable organization be in existence or qualify under a particular provision of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986 on the date of the distribution, if the charitable organization meets
 the requirement on the date of determination.

(b) If a first trust contains a determinable charitable interest, the Attorney General has the rights of a qualified beneficiary and may represent and bind the charitable interest.

(c) If a first trust contains a charitable interest, the second trust or trusts may not do any of the following:

(1) Diminish the charitable interest.

(2) Diminish the interest of an identified charitable organization that holds the charitable interest.

(3) Alter any charitable purpose stated in the first trust instrument.

(4) Alter any condition or restriction related to the charitable interest.

(d) If there are two or more second trusts, the second trusts shall be treated as one trust for purposes of determining whether the exercise of the decanting power diminishes the charitable interest or diminishes the interest of an identified charitable organization for purposes of subdivision (c).
